Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3374.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1217, as
amended by Section 119, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1217), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1217. Any person or persons acting in concert with each
other who knowingly and willfully interfere interferes with, molest
molests, obstructs, or assault firemen assaults any firefighter or
emergency medical responder in the performance of their his or her
official duties, or who knowingly and willfully obstruct obstructs,
interfere interferes with, or impede impedes the progress of firemen
Req. No. 14540 Page 1

of s uch personnel to reach the destination of a fire an emergency,
shall, upon conviction, be deemed guilty of a Class B4 felony
offense and shall be punished therefor by imprisonment in the State
Penitentiary custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of
not exceeding less than two (2) years nor more than ten (10) years
nor less than two (2) years.
B. Any person who knowingly and willfully commits an aggravated
assault or battery upon a firefighter or emergency medical responder
engaged in the performance of his or her official duties and thereby
causes serious bodily injury, as defined in Section 646 of this
title, shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable by
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a
term of not more than life.
C. Any person who knowingly and willfully causes the death of a
firefighter or emergency medical responder engaged in the
performance of his or her official duties shall, upon conviction, be
guilty of murder in the first degree, as provided in Section 701.7
of this title, and such murder shall constitute an aggravating
circumstance pursuant to the provisions of Section 701.12 of this
title for purposes of sentencing.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 701.12, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 701.12. Aggravating circumstances shall be:

Req. No. 14540 Page 2

1. The defendant was previously convicted of a felony involving
the use or threat of violence to the person;
2. The defendant knowingly created a great risk of death to
more than one person;
3. The person committed the murder for remuneration or the
promise of remuneration or employed another to commit the murder for
remuneration or the promise of remuneration;
4. The murder was especially heinous, atrocious, or cruel;
5. The murder was committed for the purpose of avoiding or
preventing a lawful arrest or prosecution;
6. The murder was committed by a person while serving a
sentence of imprisonment on conviction of a felony;
7. The existence of a probability that the defendant would
commit criminal acts of violence that would constitute a continuing
threat to society; or
8. The victim of the murder was a peace officer as defined by
Section 99 of this title, or a correctional employee of an
institution under the control of the Department of Corrections, a
firefighter, or an emergency medical responder, and such person was
killed while in the performance of his or her official duty duties.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14540 GRS 12/18/25

Req. No. 14540 Page 3